Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-593
Class V school district; board of education; vice president; duties.

The vice president of the board of education of a Class V school district shall perform all the duties of the president in case of the president's absence or disability.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 10, p. 320;

R.S.1913, § 7018;

C.S.1922, § 6649;

C.S.1929, § 79-2712;

R.S.1943, § 79-2713;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 258, p. 778;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1004.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 346.